Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.055

Election officer.

"Election officer" includes any officer who has a duty to perform relating to elections under the provisions of any statute, charter, or ordinance.

[ 2003 c 111 s 110. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.01.060. Formerly RCW 29.01.060.]